Utah statutes.
78B-5-825.   Attorney fees -- Award where action or defense in bad faith --
Exceptions.
(1)  In civil actions, the court shall award reasonable attorney fees to a
prevailing party if the court determines that the action or defense to the
action was without merit and not brought or asserted in good faith, except
under Subsection (2).
(2)  The court, in its discretion, may award no fees or limited fees against a
party under Subsection (1), but only if the court:
(a)  finds the party has filed an affidavit of impecuniosity in the action
before the court; or
(b)  the court enters in the record the reason for not awarding fees under the
provisions of Subsection (1).
